District of Columbia statutes.
26-319

Limitations on business.

(a)

No licensee under this chapter shall engage in the business of discounting of notes, bills of exchange, checks, or other evidences of indebtedness, nor shall such a discounting business be conducted on the same premises where the licensee is conducting business pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

No licensee shall at any time cash or advance any monies on a post dated check.

(c)

Repealed.

History

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 20, 45 DCR 1782
Nov. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 17-42, § 2(c), 54 DCR 9988

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-1119.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-42 repealed subsec. (c).

Effective Dates

Section 4 of D.C. Law 17-42 provided: “This act shall take effect following the certification by the Chief Financial Officer, through a revised quarterly revenue estimate for fiscal year 2008, that local funds exceed the annual revenue estimates incorporated in the fiscal year 2008 budget and financial plan in an amount sufficient to account for its fiscal effect. The Chief Financial Officer shall set aside revenue to account for the cost of fully implementing this act.”